Vermont, session 2025-2026, S237.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 5305 is amended to read:
§ 5305. INFORMATION CONCERNING RELEASE FROM CUSTODY
(a) Victims and affected persons shall have the right to request notification
by the agency having custody of the defendant before the defendant is released,
including a release on bail or conditions of release, furlough, or other
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 2 of 13
community program; upon termination or discharge from probation; or
whenever the defendant escapes, is recaptured, dies, or receives a pardon or
commutation of sentence. Notice shall be given to the victim or affected
person as expeditiously as possible at the address or telephone number
provided to the agency having custody of the defendant by the person
requesting notice. Any address or telephone number so provided shall be kept
confidential. The prosecutor’s office shall ensure that victims are made aware
of their right to notification of an offender’s scheduled release date pursuant to
this section. Notwithstanding this subsection, the right to information for
victims of delinquent acts is governed by 33 V.S.A. chapters 52 and 52A.
(b) If the defendant is released on conditions at arraignment, the
prosecutor’s office shall inform the victim of a listed crime of the conditions of
release.
(c)(1) If requested by a victim of a listed crime, the Department of
Corrections shall:
(1)(A) at least 30 days before a parole board Parole Board hearing
concerning the defendant, inform the victim of the hearing and of the victim’s
right to testify before the parole board Parole Board or to submit a written
statement for the parole board Parole Board to consider; and
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 3 of 13
(2)(B) promptly inform the victim of the decision of the parole board
Parole Board, including providing to the victim any conditions attached to the
defendant’s release on parole.
(2) Unless waived by the victim of a listed crime, the inmate shall not be
present when the victim testifies at the parole eligibility hearing.
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 403 is amended to read:
§ 403. POWERS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE COMMISSIONER
REGARDING PAROLE
The Commissioner is charged with the following powers and
responsibilities regarding the administration of parole:
* * *
(6) To provide regular training for the Parole Board, at least annually, in
collaboration with the Parole Board Director, on topics related to making
determinations of parole, criminogenic behavior, mental health disorders,
substance use treatment, trauma-informed work with victims of crime, and
serious crime rehabilitation.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 451 is amended to read:
§ 451. CREATION OF BOARD
(a) A Parole Board of five members is created There is created within the
Executive Branch an independent commission named the Parole Board. The
Parole Board shall be composed of one chair and four members. The
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 4 of 13
Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint five regular
the chair and members and two alternates for terms of three years in such a
manner that not more than three terms shall expire annually. Initial terms may
be less than three years. No member shall serve more than two consecutive
terms. Each member and alternate shall hold office until a successor is
appointed and qualified. The Governor shall designate the Board’s chair. As
far as practicable, the Governor shall appoint as members persons who have
knowledge of and experience in correctional treatment, crime prevention, or
human relations, criminogenic behavior, mental health treatment, substance
use disorder, or serious crime rehabilitation and shall give consideration, as far
as practicable, to geographic representation of the State. The Board shall
select one of its members to serve as Vice Chair vice chair of the Board. If the
Chair resigns or is otherwise permanently unable to serve on the Board, the
Vice Chair shall serve as interim chair until the Governor designates a new
chair pursuant to this section. The Chair or the executive director may assign
alternates to serve on the Board in the absence of a regular member and such
alternates shall have all the powers and authority of a regular member when so
assigned.
(b) Three members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct
of a meeting. Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 172, the concurrence of a majority
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 5 of 13
of members present at a Parole Board meeting shall be necessary and sufficient
for Board action.
(c) The Chair of the Parole Board shall be entitled to compensation in the
amount of $20,500.00 annually, effective on the first pay period in fiscal year
2006, which shall be in lieu of any per diem otherwise authorized by law a
full-time, exempt employee. If the Vice Chair assumes the duties of the Chair
for a period in excess of 30 consecutive days, the compensation otherwise
payable to the Chair during his or her the Chair’s absence shall be paid to the
Vice Chair.
(d) At least annually, each member of the Parole Board shall attend
trainings designated by the Parole Board Director.
Sec. 4. 28 V.S.A. § 455 is amended to read:
§ 455. DIRECTOR
(a) The position of Parole Board Director is created. The Director shall be
appointed by the Governor after consultation with the Board.
(b) The Director shall serve for a term of four years commencing on March
1 and continuing until his or her a successor is appointed.
(c) The Director shall be exempt from classified State service.
(d) The Secretary of Human Services, in consultation with the Parole Board
and the Department of Human Resources, shall establish the minimum and
preferred qualifications, duties, and compensation of the Director.
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 6 of 13
(e) The Director shall be responsible for the overall function of the Parole
Board, ensuring legal compliance, developing and implementing all policies
and procedures of the Board, and developing and providing training to the
Board, in collaboration with the Commissioner.
Sec. 5. 28 V.S.A. § 456 is amended to read:
§ 456. PAROLE BOARD INDEPENDENCE
(a) The Parole Board shall be an independent and impartial body.
(b) In a pending parole revocation hearing, the Parole Board shall not be
counseled by:
(1) Assistant Attorneys General; and
(2) any attorney employed by the Department of Corrections.
(c) If any attorney employed by the Department of Corrections or an
Assistant Attorney General or the direct supervisor of an Assistant Attorney
General who represents the Department of Corrections in parole revocation
hearings provides training to the Parole Board members on the subject of
parole revocation hearings, the Defender General shall be notified prior to the
training and given the opportunity to participate.
(d) The Parole Board shall be responsible for submission of an annual
budget to the Governor.
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 7 of 13
Sec. 6. 28 V.S.A. § 501 is amended to read:
§ 501. ELIGIBILITY FOR PAROLE CONSIDERATION
An inmate who is serving a sentence of imprisonment who is not eligible
for presumptive parole pursuant to section 501a of this title shall be eligible for
parole consideration as follows:
(1) If the inmate’s sentence has no minimum term or a zero minimum
term, the inmate shall be eligible for parole consideration within 12 months
after commitment to a correctional facility.
(2) If the inmate’s sentence has a minimum term, the inmate shall be
eligible for parole consideration after the inmate has served the minimum term
of the sentence and has no additional pending criminal charges.
Sec. 7. 28 V.S.A. § 502c is amended to read:
§ 502c. PAROLE AGREEMENT
(a) When an inmate is paroled, the Parole Board shall issue a parole
agreement, which shall set forth the name of the inmate paroled, the crime the
inmate was convicted of, the date and place of trial, the sentence, and the terms
and conditions of the parole. A copy of the parole agreement shall be
furnished to the parolee and the Commissioner.
(b) The parole agreement shall not become effective until it is signed by the
inmate. The Parole Board may withdraw the granting of parole at any time
before the parole agreement is signed by the inmate. After the parole
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 8 of 13
agreement is signed by the parolee, parole can only be revoked in accordance
with subchapter 4 of this chapter or if the parolee requests to voluntarily
relinquish parole.
(c) A copy of the parole agreement shall be full authority for the
Commissioner to exercise all supervision and control over the parolee
prescribed by law, and shall be sufficient warrant for the detention of the
parolee as provided in subdivision 403(2) of this title.
Sec. 8. 28 V.S.A. § 507 is amended to read:
§ 507. NOTIFICATION TO VICTIM AND OPPORTUNITY TO TESTIFY
(a) At least 30 days prior to a parole eligibility hearing, the victim of a
listed crime as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 5301(7), shall be notified as to the time
and location of the hearing. Such notification may be waived by the victim in
writing.
(b) At a parole eligibility hearing, unless waived by the victim of a listed
crime as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 5301(7), the inmate shall not be present when
the victim testifies before the Parole Board.
(c) Parole Board proceedings shall be subject to the Vermont Open
Meeting Law.
(d) As used in this section, “victim” means:
(1) a victim of the listed crime for which the Parole Board is
determining the inmate’s eligibility for parole; and
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 9 of 13
(2) a victim of a listed crime of which the inmate was convicted other
than the listed crime for which the Parole Board is determining the inmate’s
eligibility for parole. [Repealed.]
Sec. 9. 28 V.S.A. § 818 is amended to read:
§ 818. EARNED TIME; REDUCTION OF TERM
(a) On or before September 1, 2020, the Department of Corrections shall
file a proposed rule pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 implementing an earned
time program to become effective on January 1, 2021. The Commissioner
shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section as an emergency
rule and concurrently propose them as a permanent rule. The emergency rule
shall be deemed to meet the standard for the adoption of emergency rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 844(a).
(b) The earned time program implemented pursuant to this section shall
comply with the following standards:
(1) The program shall be available for all sentenced offenders, including
furloughed offenders and parolees, provided that the program shall not be
available to offenders on probation or parole, to offenders eligible for a
reduction of term pursuant to section 811 of this title, to offenders sentenced to
serve an interrupted sentence, or to offenders sentenced to life without parole.
Offenders currently serving a sentence shall be eligible to begin earning a
reduction in term when the earned time program becomes effective.
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 10 of 13
Notwithstanding this subdivision (1), when an offender has been convicted of a
disqualifying offense, the offender’s ability to participate and earn time in the
program shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (5) of this subsection.
(2) Offenders shall earn a reduction of seven days in the minimum and
maximum sentence for each month during which the offender:
(A) is not adjudicated of a major disciplinary rule violation; and
(B) is not reincarcerated from the community for a violation of
release conditions, provided that an offender who loses a residence for a reason
other than fault on the part of the offender shall not be deemed reincarcerated
under this subdivision.
(3) An offender who receives post-adjudication treatment in a residential
setting for a substance use disorder shall earn a reduction of one day in the
minimum and maximum sentence for each day that the offender receives the
inpatient treatment. While a person an offender is in residential substance
abuse treatment, he or she the offender shall not be eligible for earned time
except as provided in this subsection.
(4) The Department shall:
(A) ensure that all victims of record are notified of the earned time
program at its outset and made aware of the option to receive notifications
from the Department pursuant to this subdivision;
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 11 of 13
(B) provide timely notice not less frequently than every 90 days to
the offender, and to any victim who opts to receive the notice, any time the
offender receives a reduction in the offender’s term of supervision pursuant to
this section;
(C) maintain a system that documents and records all such reductions
in each offender’s permanent record; and
(D) record any reduction in an offender’s term of supervision
pursuant to this section on a monthly basis and ensure that victims who want
information regarding changes in an offender’s minimum release date have
access to such information.
(5) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, an offender who was serving a
sentence for a disqualifying offense on January 1, 2021, shall not earn any
earned time sentence reductions under this section after the effective date of
this act. This subdivision (5) shall not be construed to limit or affect earned
time that an offender has earned on or before the effective date of this act April
26, 2021.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Disqualifying offense” means:
(A) murder in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2301;
(B) voluntary manslaughter in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2304;
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 12 of 13
(C) kidnapping in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2405;
(D) lewd and lascivious conduct with a child in violation of 13
V.S.A. § 2602, provided that the offense shall not be considered a
disqualifying offense if the offender is under 18 years of age, the child is at
least 12 years of age, and the conduct is consensual;
(E) sexual assault in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 3252(a) or (b);
(F) aggravated sexual assault in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 3253; or
(G) aggravated sexual assault of a child in violation of 13 V.S.A.
§ 3253a.
(2) “Interrupted sentence” means a sentence that is not served
continuously, including a sentence to be served in intervals or a sentence to the
work crew.
Sec. 10. PAROLE BOARD; POSITIONS; APPROPRIATION
(a) The following permanent positions are created in the Parole Board:
(1) one full-time, exempt Chair of the Board;
(2) one full-time, exempt staff attorney; and
(3) one full-time, classified administrative assistant.
(b) There is appropriated to the Parole Board from the General Fund in
fiscal year 2027 the sum of:
(1) $160,000.00 for the Chair of the Board;
(2) $150,000.00 for the staff attorney;
VT LEG #385942 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.237
2026 Page 13 of 13
(3) $100,000.00 for the administrative assistant; and
(4) $20,000.00 for training required by this act.
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385942 v.1